tests/copulas.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[lexc] after an adjective":
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : güzelim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg> : güzeldim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : güzelmişim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg> : güzelsem
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel miyim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel miydim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzelmiş miyim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel miysem
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><aor><p1><sg> : güzel değilim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><ifi><p1><sg> : güzel değildim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><past><p1><sg> : güzel değilmişim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><cond><p1><sg> : güzel değilsem
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel değil miyim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel değil miydim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><past><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel değilmiş miyim
    güzel<adj>+i<cop><neg><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : güzel değil miysem

  "[lexc] after aor":
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : giderim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg> : giderdim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gidermişim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg> : gidersem
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gider miyim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gider miydim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidermiş miyim
    git<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gider miysem

  "[lexc] after fut":
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gideceğim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg> : gidecektim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gidecekmişim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg> : gideceksem
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidecek miyim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidecek miydim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidecekmiş miyim
    git<v><iv><fut>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidecek miysem

  "[lexc] after past":
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gitmişim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg> : gitmiştim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gitmişmişim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg> : gitmişsem
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gitmiş miyim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gitmiş miydim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gitmişmiş miyim
    git<v><iv><past>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gitmiş miysem

  "[lexc] after progressive":
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gidiyorum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg> : gidiyordum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg> : gitmiyormuşum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg> : gitmiyorsam
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidiyor muyum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><ifi><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidiyor muydum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><past>+i<cop><aor><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidiyorumuş muyum
    git<v><iv><prog>+i<cop><cond><p1><sg>+mı<qst> : gidiyor muysam
